Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.305

District costs and expenses—Credit or reduction of assessments.

At its option, a county may include the value of right-of-way or property that is donated or given to the county for purposes of an improvement to be financed by a road improvement district, together with the costs of acquiring other rights-of-way or property for the improvement that was not donated or given to the county, in the costs of the improvement and credit or reduce the assessments imposed on benefited property for the value of the right-of-way or property that the owner of the benefited property donated or gave to the county for the improvement.

[ 1991 c 363 s 90.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.